Maine, session 132, LD1688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §2158 is enacted to read:
§2158. Medical education relating to infection-associated chronic conditions
The board shall encourage a licensee or applicant for relicensure under this chapter to
attend continuing education, including continuing education required for licensure of an
advanced practice registered nurse, relating to infection-associated chronic conditions,
including long COVID, chronic Lyme disease, myalgic encephalomyelitis, postural
orthostatic tachycardia syndrome and dysautonomia. For purposes of this section, "long
COVID" means a group of health problems related to and persisting or developing after an
initial period of COVID-19 infection that may be debilitating and may last from several
weeks to a period of years and "COVID-19" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section
4320-P, subsection 1, paragraph A.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §2581, as amended by PL 2017, c. 189, §1, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
The board shall encourage a licensee or applicant for relicensure to attend continuing
education approved by the board under this section relating to infection-associated chronic
conditions, including long COVID, chronic Lyme disease, myalgic encephalomyelitis,
postural orthostatic tachycardia syndrome and dysautonomia. For purposes of this
paragraph, "long COVID" means a group of health problems related to and persisting or
developing after an initial period of COVID-19 infection that may be debilitating and may
last from several weeks to a period of years and "COVID-19" has the same meaning as in
Title 24-A, section 4320-P, subsection 1, paragraph A.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §3280-A, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Continuing medical education relating to infection-associated chronic
conditions. The board shall encourage a licensee to attend continuing medical education
under subsection 2, paragraph B, relating to infection-associated chronic conditions,
including long COVID, chronic Lyme disease, myalgic encephalomyelitis, postural
orthostatic tachycardia syndrome and dysautonomia. For purposes of this subsection, "long
COVID" means a group of health problems related to and persisting or developing after an
initial period of COVID-19 infection that may be debilitating and may last from several
weeks to a period of years and "COVID-19" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section
4320-P, subsection 1, paragraph A.